Tennessee, session 114, SB1409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-930(c)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(A) Is a sophomore, junior, or senior in high school; or
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1409
003296
- 1 -